California, session 20252026, AB967.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2438 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2438. (a) The board shall expedite the licensure process for an applicant who submits an application that is accompanied by an expedite fee fixed by the board.(b)The board shall fix the all of the following:(1) Payment of an expedite fee fixed by the board at an amount equal to the cost of expediting the licensure process for applicants applying under subdivision (a), but the fee shall not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250). (2) Proof of an active and unrestricted license issued by another state, district, or territory of the United States to practice medicine.(3) Documentation demonstrating that the applicant intends to provide direct patient care in this state within 90 days of the date of the application, including, but not limited to, a letter from an employer or health care entity indicating all of the following:(A) The applicant has accepted employment or entered into a contract to provide direct patient care.(B) The applicant’s starting date.(C) The location where the applicant will be providing direct patient care. (c)(b) (1) This section does not change any existing licensure requirements.(2) An applicant applying for expedited licensure under subdivision (a) shall meet all applicable statutory and regulatory licensure requirements.(d)(c) (1) This section does not require an applicant applying for expedited licensure pursuant to Sections 115.4, 115.5, 135.4, 870, and 2092 to pay the expedite fee established in subdivision (a). (2) Applications submitted under this section shall not take priority over applications for expedited licensure under any of the sections described in this subdivision.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.